Washington statutes.
RCW 37.12.100

Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, Skokomish, Muckleshoot, Tulalip, and Colville Indian reservations—Retrocession of criminal jurisdiction—Intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to authorize a procedure for the retrocession, to the Quileute Tribe, Chehalis Tribe, Swinomish Tribe, Skokomish Tribe, Muckleshoot Tribe, Tulalip Tribes, and the Colville Confederated Tribes of Washington and the United States, of criminal jurisdiction over Indians for acts occurring on tribal lands or allotted lands within the Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, Skokomish, Muckleshoot, Tulalip, or Colville Indian reservation and held in trust by the United States or subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the United States.

RCW 37.12.100 through 37.12.140 in no way expand the Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, Skokomish, Muckleshoot, Tulalip, or Colville tribe's criminal or civil jurisdiction, if any, over non-Indians or fee title property. RCW 37.12.100 through 37.12.140 shall have no effect whatsoever on water rights, hunting and fishing rights, the established pattern of civil jurisdiction existing on the lands of the Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, Skokomish, Muckleshoot, Tulalip, or Colville Indian reservation, the established pattern of regulatory jurisdiction existing on the lands of the Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, Skokomish, Muckleshoot, Tulalip, or Colville Indian reservation, taxation, or any other matter not specifically included within the terms of RCW 37.12.100 through 37.12.140.

[ 1995 c 202 s 1; 1995 c 177 s 1; 1994 c 12 s 1; 1988 c 108 s 1; 1986 c 267 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1995 c 177 s 1 and by 1995 c 202 s 1, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Severability—1986 c 267: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 267 s 8.]